Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB682.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 177.035 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) If the department determines that it is necessary for any fireplugs, pipes, mains, conduits, cables, wires,
towers, poles, and other equipment and appliances, belonging to any municipality or a municipally
owned utility, or any water district established pursuant to KRS Chapter 74, any water association
established pursuant to KRS Chapter 273, any local school district, or any sanitation district established
pursuant to KRS Chapter 220, to be removed or relocated on, along, over, or under a highway, in order
to construct, reconstruct, relocate, or improve any highway, the municipality, municipally owned utility,
water district, local school district, or the sanitation district shall relocate or remove them in accordance
with the order of the department.
(b) The costs and expenses of relocation or removal required by this section, including the costs of
installing facilities in a new location, and the cost of any lands, or any rights or interest in lands, and
any other rights, acquired to accomplish the relocation or removal, shall be ascertained and paid by the
department as a part of the cost of improving or constructing highways.
(2) The term "utility" as used in subsections (3) to (5) of this section means:[shall mean]
(a) Any utility not referenced in subsection (1) of this section;[, and the term shall mean]
(b) Any utility as defined in KRS 278.010; and
(c) Cable operators and broadband providers.
(3) If a utility has facilities located within the public right-of-way[ pursuant to KRS 416.140], the department may
reimburse the utility the cost to relocate the utility's facilities to a location either within or without the public
right-of-way if the relocation is required due to a highway construction project, subject to the following
conditions:
(a) The utility shall be required to submit to the department for the department's approval a plan for
relocating the utility's facilities. The plan shall include:
1. A proposal for the relocation, including plans and a cost estimate developed in accordance with
department guidelines; and
2. A reasonable schedule of calendar days for completing the relocation that has been agreed to by
the department. If, due to circumstances beyond the utility's control, the utility or the department
cannot meet the specified completion date included in the plan, the department may grant an
extension to the utility for a time period agreed upon by both parties; and
(b) The utility shall be required to have either:
1. Entered into a written agreement with the department to include the relocation of the facilities as
part of the department's construction contract. The utility may, with the approval of the
department, perform a portion of the relocation work under this subparagraph with contractors or
employees of the utility; or
2. Entered into a written agreement with the department for the utility to remove all of its facilities
that conflict with the highway construction project, as determined by the department, prior to
letting the construction contract. The utility may perform a portion or all of the relocation work
under this subparagraph with contractors or employees of the utility.
(4) A utility that enters into an agreement with the department under subsection (3)(b) of this section shall be
required to complete the relocation work in compliance with the schedule included in the plan required to be
submitted under subsection (3)(a) of this section. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply if the
department fails to undertake the highway construction project within the time period specified in the
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
agreement, and in this instance, the department shall be required to reimburse the utility any allowable cost the
utility has incurred to relocate its facilities in compliance with the plan approved by the department.
(5) The department shall reimburse a utility as authorized in subsection (3) of this section if the department is
satisfied that the utility's facilities have been relocated in conformance with the plan approved by the
department. The utility shall have twelve (12) months from the completion date of the relocation, according to
the schedule of calendar days, to submit a reimbursement request for relocation costs to the department.
(6) The provisions of this section shall not amend or affect in any way the provisions of KRS 179.265.
Signed by Governor March 24, 2025.